test/src/morphology/N-vwtiim_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - võţīm: # Noun 154 'eng /est võti/fin' - full paradigm
     võţīm+N+Sg+Nom: võţīm
     võţīm+N+Sg+Gen: võţīm
     võţīm+N+Sg+Par: võţīmt
     võţīm+N+Sg+Dat: võţīmõn
     võţīm+N+Sg+Ins: võţīmõks
     võţīm+N+Sg+Ill: võţīmõ
     võţīm+N+Sg+Ela: võţīmõst
     võţīm+N+Pl+Nom: võţmõd
     võţīm+N+Pl+Gen: võţmõd
     võţīm+N+Pl+Par: võţmidi
     võţīm+N+Pl+Dat: võţmõdõn
     võţīm+N+Pl+Ins: võţmõdõks
     võţīm+N+Pl+Ill: võţmiž
     võţīm+N+Pl+Ela: võţmist
